Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2504
Plane coordinates; recording; waiver.

No coordinate or coordinates based on the Nebraska Plane Coordinate System purporting to define the position of a point on a land boundary shall be presented to be recorded in any public land record, plat, easement, exhibit, certified corner record, or deed record unless such coordinate or coordinates are accompanied by a description of the horizontal datum, realization, and methodology used and published within the same document. The State Surveyor may grant a waiver of the requirements of this section upon submission of evidence that the standards of accuracy and specifications used exceed the requirements of this section.

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 66;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1604;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 500;

Laws 2024, LB102, § 13.